District of Columbia statutes.
1-1305

Surveyor’s office to be legal office of record of plats and subdivisions.

The Office of the Surveyor of the District shall be the legal office of record of the plats and subdivisions of all private property in the District of Columbia and of all property belonging to the District of Columbia. The copies of all records of the division of squares and lots made between the public and the original proprietors and all plats, papers, books, maps, and records now in the Office of the Surveyor shall remain therein.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1424, ch. 854, § 1574
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 544, ch. 1329

History

1981 Ed., § 1-905.
1973 Ed., § 1-605.

Prior Codifications